Utah statutes.
31A-25-204.   Character requirements.
Each applicant for a license under this chapter shall show to the commissioner
all of the following:
(1)  he or it has the good faith intent to engage in the type of business the
license applied for would permit;
(2)  if a natural person, he is competent and trustworthy, or, if a
partnership or corporation, all the partners, directors, principal officers,
or persons having comparable powers are trustworthy; and
(3)  if a natural person, he is at least 18 years of age.
